Illinois, session 104th, SB1085.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Gas Pipeline Safety Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 20/1)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 551)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Illinois Gas Pipeline Safety Act.9(Source: P.A. 76-1588.)